Utah statutes.
17-27a-207.   Notice for an amendment to a subdivision -- Notice for
vacation of or change to street.
(1) (a)  For an amendment to a subdivision, each county shall provide notice
of the date, time, and place of at least one public meeting, as provided in
Subsection (1)(b).
(b)  At least 10 calendar days before the public meeting, the notice required
under Subsection (1)(a) shall be:
(i)  mailed and addressed to the record owner of each parcel within specified
parameters of that property; or
(ii)  posted on the property proposed for subdivision, in a visible location,
with a sign of sufficient size, durability, and print quality that is
reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.
(2)  Each county shall provide notice as required by Section 17-27a-208 for a
subdivision that involves a vacation, alteration, or amendment of a street.
